Hawaii statutes.
§634-33 Service in cases of operation of
motor vehicles. [(a)] The use and operation by any person, whether a
resident or a nonresident of the State, of any motor vehicle upon a public
highway in this State shall subject the person to the jurisdiction of the
courts of this State in any action or proceeding against the person growing out
of any accident or collision in which the person and the motor vehicle so used
and operated may be involved. The use and operation of the motor vehicle is
deemed a signification of the person's agreement that any summons against the
person which is served is of the same legal force and validity as if served
upon the person personally within this State, whether the person is a
nonresident of this State or at the time a cause of action arises is a resident
of this State but subsequently becomes a nonresident of this State. Service of
such summons is to be made as provided by section 634-36, if the defendant
cannot be found in the State.

[(b)] This section shall not be construed as
repealing or amending any other provision of law relating to the service of
process nor as establishing an exclusive method of service of process in cases
to which this section may apply. [L 1953, c 167, §§1, 2; RL 1955, §230-33; am L
1959, c 15, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §15; am L 1963, c 114, §3; am L 1965, c
86, §1; HRS §634-69; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(l); ren HRS §634-33; am L 1982, c
204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984, c 209, §2; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Nonresident violator compact, see chapter 291A.

Case Notes

Section 657-18 did not apply to toll the no-fault statute of
limitations where a nonresident motorist defendant was at all times subject to
the jurisdiction of Hawaii's courts and amenable to service of process under its
long-arm statutes as set forth in §634-36 and this section. 89 H. 1, 967 P.2d
1059 (1998).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next